Tennessee, session 114, HB0418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504(a)(22), is amended by
deleting subdivision (D) and substituting:
(D)
(i) Survey records, responses, data, identifying information as defined in
subdivision (a)(15), intra-agency and interagency communications, and other
records received to serve as input for any survey created, obtained, or compiled
by the comptroller of the treasury; provided, however, the comptroller may
publish:
(a) Aggregate survey data; and
(b) Survey responses that cannot be used to identify individuals
completing the survey.
(ii) This subdivision (a)(22)(D) does not apply to a survey conducted by
the office of open records counsel, created by § 8-4-601.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0418
000712
- 1 -